California statutes. Education Code
(A) Recognition and treatment of hypoglycemia.

(B) Administration of glucagon.

(C) Basic emergency followup procedures, including, but not limited to, calling the emergency 911 telephone number and contacting, if possible, the pupil’s parent or guardian and licensed health care provider.

(3) Training by a physician, credentialed school nurse, registered nurse, or certificated public health nurse according to the standards established pursuant to this section shall be deemed adequate training for the purposes of this section.

(4) (A) A school employee shall notify the credentialed school nurse assigned to the school district if he or she administers glucagon pursuant to this section.

(B) If a credentialed school nurse is not assigned to the school district, the school employee shall notify the superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, if he or she administers glucagon pursuant to this section.

(5) All materials necessary to administer the glucagon shall be provided by the parent or guardian of the pupil.

(c) In the case of a pupil who is able to self-test and monitor his or her blood glucose level, upon written request of the parent or guardian, and with authorization of the licensed health care provider of the pupil, a pupil with diabetes shall be permitted to test his or her blood glucose level and to otherwise provide diabetes self-care in the classroom, in any area of the school or school grounds, during any school-related activity, and, upon specific request by a parent or guardian, in a private location.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “School personnel” means any one or more employees of a school district who volunteers to be trained to administer emergency medical assistance to a pupil with diabetes.

(2) “Emergency medical assistance” means the administration of glucagon to a pupil who is suffering from severe hypoglycemia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, local educational agencies shall not prohibit pupils in middle schools, junior high schools, high schools, or adult schools,
 while on a schoolsite or participating in school activities, from carrying fentanyl test strips or a federally approved opioid antagonist for over-the-counter use for the emergency treatment of persons suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from an opioid overdose.

(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter
 school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 872, Sec. 1.   (SB 997)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.7.

(a) School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools may provide emergency stock albuterol inhalers, including, if necessary, single-use disposable holding chambers, to school nurses or trained personnel who have volunteered pursuant to subdivision (d), and school nurses or trained personnel may use an emergency stock albuterol inhaler to provide emergency medical aid to persons suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from respiratory distress.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Albuterol” means a bronchodilator used to open the airways by
 relaxing the muscles around the bronchial tubes.

(2) “Authorizing physician and surgeon” may include, but is not limited to, a physician and surgeon employed by, or contracting with, a local educational agency, a medical director of the local health department, or a local emergency medical services director.

(3) “Inhaler” means a device used for the delivery of prescribed asthma medication that is inhaled.

(4) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(5) “Metered-dose inhaler (MDI)” means a pressurized sprayer that
 delivers a measured amount of a medication.

(6) “Qualified supervisor of health” may include, but is not limited to, a school nurse.

(7) “Respiratory distress” means the sudden appearance of signs and symptoms of difficulty breathing. Signs and symptoms of respiratory distress may include one or more of the following:

(A) Complaints of a tight chest or chest pain.

(B) Wheezing or noisy breathing.

(C) Persistent coughing.

(D) Difficulty breathing.

(E) Appears to be in distress.

(F) Lips or fingernails turning blue.

(G) Shortness of breath.

(8) “Stock albuterol inhaler” means albuterol medication in the form of a metered-dose inhaler (MDI) that is ordered by a health care provider and is not prescribed for a specific person and also includes, if necessary, a single-use disposable holding chamber.

(9) “Volunteer” or “trained personnel” means an employee who has volunteered to administer stock albuterol inhalers to a person if the person is suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from respiratory distress, has been designated by a school, and has received training pursuant to subdivision (d).

(c) Each private elementary and secondary school in the state may voluntarily determine whether or not to make emergency stock albuterol inhalers and trained personnel available at its school. In making this determination, a school shall evaluate the emergency medical response time to the school and determine whether initiating emergency medical services is an acceptable alternative to stock albuterol inhalers and trained personnel. A private elementary or secondary school choosing to exercise the authority provided under this subdivision shall not receive state funds specifically for purposes of this subdivision.

(d) (1) Each public and private elementary and secondary school in the state may designate one or more volunteers to receive initial and annual refresher training, based on the standards developed pursuant
 to subdivision (e), regarding the storage and emergency use of a stock albuterol inhaler from the school nurse or other qualified person designated by an authorizing physician and surgeon.

(2) Schools are encouraged and recommended to have a minimum of two trained school employees.

(e) (1) The Superintendent shall establish, and post on the department’s internet website, minimum standards of training for the administration of stock albuterol inhalers that satisfies the requirements of paragraph (2). Every five years, or sooner as deemed necessary by the Superintendent, the Superintendent shall review minimum standards of training for the administration of stock albuterol inhalers that satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2). For purposes of this
 subdivision, the Superintendent shall consult with organizations and providers with expertise in administering stock albuterol inhalers and administering medication in a school environment, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Public Health, the Emergency Medical Services Authority, the American Academy of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, the California School Nurses Organization, the California Medical Association, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the California Society of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, the American College of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, and others.

(2) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall include all of the following:

(A) Techniques for recognizing symptoms of respiratory distress.

(B) Standards and procedures for the storage, restocking, and emergency use of stock albuterol inhalers.

(C) Emergency followup procedures, including calling the emergency 911 telephone number and contacting, if possible, the pupil’s parent or guardian and physician.

(D) Recommendations on the necessity of instruction and certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(E) Written materials covering the information required under this subdivision.

(3) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the most recent guidelines for medication administration issued by the
 department.

(4) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to a volunteer during the volunteer’s regular working hours and at no cost to the volunteer.

(5) A school shall retain for reference the written materials prepared under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2).

(f) Any local educational agency electing to utilize stock albuterol inhalers for emergency aid shall distribute a notice at least once per school year to all staff that contains the following information:

(1) A description of the volunteer request stating that the request is for volunteers to be trained to administer a stock albuterol inhaler to a person if the person is
 suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from respiratory distress, as specified in subdivision (b).

(2) A description of the training that the volunteer will receive pursuant to subdivision (d).

(g) (1) A qualified supervisor of health at a local educational agency electing to utilize stock albuterol inhalers for emergency aid shall obtain from an authorizing physician and surgeon a prescription for each school for stock albuterol inhalers. A qualified supervisor of health at a local educational agency shall be responsible for stocking the stock albuterol inhalers and restocking it if it is used.

(2) If a local educational agency does not have a qualified supervisor of health, an
 administrator at the local educational agency shall carry out the duties specified in paragraph (1).

(3) A prescription pursuant to this subdivision may be filled by local or mail order pharmacies or stock albuterol inhaler manufacturers.

(4) An authorizing physician and surgeon shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for the issuance of a prescription or order pursuant to this section, unless the physician and surgeon’s issuance of the prescription or order constitutes gross negligence or willful or malicious conduct.

(h) A school nurse or, if the school does not have a school nurse or the school nurse is not onsite or available, a volunteer may administer
 a stock albuterol inhaler to a person exhibiting potentially life-threatening symptoms of respiratory distress at school or a school activity when a physician is not immediately available. If the stock albuterol inhaler is used, it shall be restocked as soon as reasonably possible, but no later than two weeks after it is used. Stock albuterol inhalers shall be restocked before their expiration date.

(i) A volunteer shall initiate emergency medical services or other appropriate medical followup in accordance with the training materials retained pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (e).

(j) (1) A local educational agency electing to utilize stock albuterol inhalers for emergency aid shall
 not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission, other than an act or omission constituting gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct, in the emergency administration of an albuterol inhaler by any of its school nurses or trained volunteers who have volunteered pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) An employee who volunteers under this section shall be provided defense and indemnification by the local educational agency for any and all civil liability, in accordance with, but not
 limited to, that provided in Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code. This information shall be reduced to writing, provided to the volunteer, and retained in the volunteer’s personnel file.

(k) A state agency, the department, or a public school may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source for the support of the public school carrying out the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, the acceptance of stock albuterol inhalers from a manufacturer or wholesaler.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   (AB 1283)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.8.

(a) (1) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to the department to allocate to county offices of education for the purpose of purchasing and maintaining a sufficient stock of emergency opioid antagonists for local educational agencies within its jurisdiction.

 (2) (A) County offices of education shall purchase a minimum of two units for each middle school, junior high school, high school, and adult school schoolsite within their jurisdiction.

(B) Funding allocations provided to county
 offices of education pursuant to this section may be used to complement any emergency opioid antagonist resources allocated through the State Department of Health Care Services’ Naloxone Distribution Project for these purposes.

(3) County offices of education may enter into agreements with local educational agencies within their jurisdiction, or other county offices of education, to comply with the minimum purchasing requirements specified in paragraph (2).

(4) Funding allocations shall be reevaluated each year based on the factors listed in subdivision (c).

(b) Of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a), up to three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) shall be allocated to county offices of education for administrative costs to coordinate, maintain stock, and distribute emergency opioid antagonists to local
 educational agencies within their jurisdiction. The Superintendent shall develop an allocation formula for use in determining the allocation amounts for each county office of education based on the number of local educational agencies within each county office of education’s jurisdiction and the number of pupils and students served in schools within those local educational agencies.

(c) After allocations are made pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall consider, in allocating the remaining funds to county offices of education, the number of middle school, junior high school, high school, and adult school schoolsites that are within each county office of education, the number of pupils and students served by those required schoolsites, and any other factors determined by the department.

(d) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this section, county offices of
 education shall do all of the following:

(1) Coordinate the purchase of and maintain a stock of emergency opioid antagonists on behalf of local educational agencies within their jurisdiction, in a manner consistent with paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a), that is best suited for distribution and use in schools by doing all of the following:

(A) Either applying to be a qualified direct purchaser with the naloxone manufacturer to purchase the emergency opioid antagonist at the public interest price or purchasing directly from a distributor, state entity, or local entity, a quantity sufficient to stock, at a minimum, two units per middle school, junior high school, high school, and adult school schoolsite for each local educational agency within their jurisdiction, or administering the program consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(B) Distributing a minimum of two units of an emergency opioid antagonist to local educational agencies for each middle school, junior high school, high school, and adult school schoolsite within their jurisdiction, or administering the program consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(C) To the extent that the minimum stocking requirements pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) are met, county offices of education may also distribute emergency opioid antagonists to local educational agencies for distribution to elementary schoolsites.

(2) As a condition of receiving emergency opioid antagonist units from a county office of education, or consistent with an agreement pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), local educational agencies shall do the following:

(A) (i) Ensure no fewer than two schoolsite staff members per required schoolsite meet the minimum standards of training for the administration of an emergency opioid antagonist as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 49414.3 or have undergone opioid overdose prevention and treatment training and reviewed materials available on the State Department of Public Health’s internet website.

(ii) County offices of education may use resources for technical assistance on the State Department of Education or State Department of Public Health’s respective internet websites that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(I) The State Department of Public Health Office of Communications’ Fentanyl and Overdose Prevention​ toolkit.

(II) A sample school naloxone policy.

(III) School and educator resources.

(IV) Education on recognizing overdoses.

(V) A naloxone administration training video.

(B) Distribute the minimum of two units of an emergency opioid antagonist to each required schoolsite, including restocking a unit before its expiration date and, if used, as soon as reasonably possible after its use, but no later than two weeks after its use.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a school district or charter school.

(2) “Opioid antagonist” means naloxone hydrochloride, or another drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that, when administered, negates or neutralizes in whole or in part the pharmacological effects of an opioid in the body, and has been approved for the treatment of an opioid overdose.

(f) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for
 the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 55.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49415.

On or before July 1, 2004, the State Board of Education shall adopt maximum weight standards for textbooks used by pupils in elementary and secondary schools. The weight standards shall take into consideration the health risks to pupils who transport textbooks to and from school each day.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

49417.

(a) A public school may solicit and receive nonstate funds to acquire and maintain an automated external defibrillator (AED). These funds shall only be used to acquire and maintain an AED and to provide training to school employees regarding use of an AED.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), if an employee of a school district complies with Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code in rendering emergency care or treatment through the use, attempted use, or nonuse of an AED at the scene of an emergency, the employee shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of the emergency care or treatment.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), if a public school or school district complies with the requirements of Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code, the public school or school district shall be covered by Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code and shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of the emergency care or treatment.

(d) Subdivisions
 (b) and (c) do not apply in the case of personal injury or wrongful death that results from gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct on the part of the person who uses, attempts to use, or maliciously fails to use an AED to render emergency care or treatment.

(e) This section does not alter the requirements of Section 1797.196 of the Health and
 Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.   (AB 2217)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Office of School-Based Health Programs [49418. - 49421.5.]

49418.

For purposes of this article, “office” means the Office of School-Based Health Programs established within the department that is dedicated to expanding access to school-based health programs pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 61.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

49419.

(a) The department shall, no later than January 1, 2022, establish an Office of School-Based Health Programs for the purpose of assisting local educational agencies regarding the current health-related programs under the purview of the department. The scope of the office shall include collaborating with the State Department of Health Care Services and other departments and offices involved in the provision of school-based health services. The scope of the office shall also include assisting local educational agencies with information on, and participation in, the following school-based health programs:

(1) The Administrative Claiming process described in Section 14132.47 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program described in Section 14132.06 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) All other programs under the federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment services entitlement supporting the provision of health services to eligible pupils, including screening, diagnostic, and treatment services to prevent, identify, or address physical and behavioral health needs.

(4) Providing consultation and technical assistance to local educational agencies on school-based nursing and health services.

(5) Coordinating school health program activities with public health, social services, environmental, and local educational agencies, and other public and private entities.

(6) Participating in the development of policies, standards, and guidelines, interpreting updates, and disseminating policies, standards, guidelines, and procedures to enhance coordinated school health programs.

(7) Promoting quality assurance in school health services by initiating and coordinating a quality assurance program that includes needs assessment, data collection and analysis, and evidenced-based practices.

(8) Initiating, participating in, and using research studies related to a coordinated school health program, the health needs of children and youth, school nursing practice, and related issues.

(9) Additional school-based health efforts available to local educational agencies through the California Health and Human Services Agency and its
 offices and departments.

(b) The office shall advise the department on opportunities for effective coordination between health and education systems at the state, regional, and local levels to advance school-based health programs, and on strategies to leverage school-based Medi-Cal programs to sustain school-based health services.

(c) The office shall collaborate with the local educational agency selected to provide guidance around Medi-Cal billing pursuant to Section 49422.

(d) The office may provide technical assistance to local educational agencies on matters such as expanding services, simplifying the administration of school-based health programs, and increasing local educational agency participation in, and maximizing allowable federal financial participation in, the school-based health programs.

(e) The office shall assist in the development of the telehealth guidelines required pursuant to Section 49429.

(f) The office shall provide technical assistance, outreach, and informational materials to local educational agencies on allowable services and on the submission of claims. The office shall not otherwise provide informational materials related to the State Department of Health Care Services’ school-based health programs that have not been approved by the State Department of Health Care Services, as the State Department of Health Care Services is the sole state agency with authority from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to define allowable services and submit claims for federal matching funds.

(g) The office shall oversee the School Health Demonstration Project established pursuant to
 Section 49421.

(h) The office may form, or participate in, advisory groups for technical assistance and other purposes as deemed necessary.

(i) To the extent necessary, the State Department of Health Care Services shall make available to the office any information on other school-based dental, health, and mental health programs, and school-based health centers, that may receive Medi-Cal funding.

(j) (1) This section shall not prohibit the department from using an existing branch or division within the department to serve as the office, in lieu of establishing a new office, for purposes of implementing this section.

(2) This section shall not limit or modify Section 14132.06 of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 61.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

49420.

(a) The department shall by January 1, 2022, appoint a state school nurse consultant to be housed within the office, as established pursuant to Section 49419. The state school nurse consultant shall be a school nurse with a services credential with a specialization in health for a school nurse issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, who has a minimum of five years of experience in school health program management. The state school nurse consultant shall work with local educational agencies and school nurses to promote quality school nursing services and school health programs that address the broad health needs of pupils. The state school nurse consultant, in performing the duties of the position, shall collaborate with the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Health Care
 Services, the Governor’s Office of Emergency Services, and the Board of Registered Nursing.

(b) The state school nurse consultant shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) Serving as a liaison and resource expert in school nursing and school health program areas for local, regional, state, and national school health care providers and policy setting groups.

(2) Monitoring, interpreting, synthesizing, and working to ensure that the office disseminates relevant information associated with changes in health, nursing, and medical care, school nursing practice, legislation, and legal issues that impact schools and the pupils they serve.

(3) Fostering and promoting staff development for school nurses, which may include planning and providing
 orientation, coordinating or providing educational offerings, and networking with universities and other providers of continuing education to meet identified needs.

(4) Participating in state-level public interagency partnerships and private partnerships with statewide stakeholders to foster a coordinated school health program, representing school nurses in multidisciplinary collaborations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 61.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

49421.

(a) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent on a one-time basis for the School Health Demonstration Project. The School Health Demonstration Project is hereby established in the office as a pilot project to expand comprehensive health and mental health services to public school pupils by providing local educational agencies with intensive assistance and support to build the capacity for long-term sustainability by leveraging multiple revenue sources. For these purposes, the project is intended to provide training and technical assistance on the requirements for health care provider participation in the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 14043) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to enable
 local educational agencies to participate in, contract with, and conduct billing and claiming in the Medi-Cal program through all of the following:

(1) The Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program.

(2) The School-Based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program.

(3) Contracting or entering into a memorandum of understanding with Medi-Cal managed care plans as a participating Medi-Cal managed care plan contracting provider.

(4) Contracting with or entering into a memorandum of understanding with county mental health plans for specialty mental health services, such as through the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic and Treatment Program.

(5) Contracting with
 community-based providers to deliver health and mental health services to pupils in school through contracts with Medi-Cal managed care plans or county mental health plans.

(b) On or before June 30, 2022, the Superintendent, in consultation with the executive director of the state board and the State Department of Health Care Services, shall select up to three organizations to serve as technical assistance teams for purposes of the pilot project. Technical assistance teams selected to serve shall be a consortia that consists of one or more local educational agencies, county agencies, or community-based organizations with experience in general and special education mental health program and service development, school finance, health care, Medi-Cal managed care contracting and benefits, Medicaid billing, commercial health insurance, and data analysis. The technical assistance teams are intended to provide hands-on, intensive support for a
 two-year period to the local educational agencies selected to be pilot participants to create capacity for those local educational agencies to become self-sustaining by securing federal reimbursement and other revenue sources for health and mental health services provided to pupils. In selecting the technical assistance teams, consideration shall be given to demonstrated expertise, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Knowledge of the process to submit claims through the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program, the School-Based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and drawing down federal reimbursement for Medi-Cal services.

(2) The knowledge and capacity to provide direct, hands-on assistance and support to selected local educational agencies in securing federal reimbursement for health and mental health services provided to pupils, and
 identifying additional sources of funding through programs identified in subdivision (a).

(3) Experience working with the department, the State Department of Health Care Services, county health departments, county behavioral health departments, Medi-Cal managed care plans, private health care service plans and health insurers, and the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(4) Experience in the legally compliant development and sustainable funding of general and special education mental health programs and supports in public schools, including the Multi-Tiered System of Supports, positive behavioral interventions and supports services for children under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), public school contracting
 requirements, and relevant state and federal privacy protections.

(c) On or before September 1, 2022, the department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall select up to 25 local educational agencies to serve as pilot participants for a period of two years. In selecting local educational agencies to serve as pilot participants, consideration shall be given to all of the following factors:

(1) Demonstrated need for health and mental health services for pupils.

(2) Commitment of the local educational agency’s leadership to expand health and mental health services for all pupils through school-based services, school-connected services, or both.

(3) Willingness to reinvest increased reimbursements gained through the pilot
 project into direct health and mental health services for pupils.

(4) Unduplicated pupil count.

(5) Geographic diversity of the state.

(6) Mix of urban, suburban, and rural.

(d) A local educational agency selected to serve as a pilot participant pursuant to subdivision (c) shall receive up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year for each of the two years it participates in the pilot project. Funds shall be used for contracting with one of the technical assistance teams identified by the department pursuant to subdivision (b), and may also be used to address needs identified by the in-depth analysis conducted by the technical assistance provider.

(e) The technical assistance
 teams selected pursuant to subdivision (b) shall, under the direction of the department, work with each pilot participant to do all of the following:

(1) Conduct an analysis of all of the following related to the local educational agency:

(A) The need for health and mental health services for pupils.

(B) The current capacity within the local educational agency to meet those needs.

(C) Current participation in the programs identified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(D) The barriers to participating in the programs identified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(E) Any existing partnerships with county
 agencies or community-based agencies to provide health and mental health services to pupils.

(2) Work with local educational agency staff to establish or expand the expertise necessary to maximize federal reimbursement revenue through an analysis of past claims and review eligible school expenditures to ensure maximum usage of potential Medi-Cal reimbursements, including the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment services provided to eligible pupils.

(3) Facilitate the exploration of opportunities to collaborate with county mental health plans, Medi-Cal managed care plans, and private health care service plans and health insurers to establish partnerships through memoranda of understanding or other means to coordinate the funding and provision of health and mental health services to pupils.

(4) Complete, and provide to the department, a final report at the conclusion of the pilot project with data on any increases in the level of health and mental health services provided to pupils in the local educational agency, any improved measurable outcomes for pupils, increased funding secured, plans for ongoing sustainability of health and mental health services beyond the pilot project period, and recommendations on maximizing federal reimbursement and other revenue sources to provide effective health and mental health services to pupils.

(f) (1) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, participating local educational agencies, and the technical assistance teams established pursuant to subdivision (b), shall prepare and submit to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before January 1, 2025, or six months after the final local
 educational agency has ended its service as a pilot participant, whichever comes first, a final report of the pilot programs established pursuant to this section. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Best practices developed by local educational agencies that ensure every pupil receives an uninterrupted continuum of effective care services.

(B) Program requirements and support services needed for the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program, the School-Based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and medically necessary federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment benefits, to ensure ease of use and access for local educational agencies.

(C) Total dollars drawn down from federal sources by local educational agencies participating in the
 pilot project.

(D) The number of pupils receiving health and mental health services by participating local educational agencies throughout the course of the pilot project, including breakdowns by subgroups, and measurable improved outcomes for those pupils.

(E) Recommendations for expanding the program statewide, including an estimate of the cost of fully funding an ongoing technical assistance and support program on a statewide basis.

(F) Strategies for working with the State Department of Health Care Services to coordinate, streamline, and prevent the duplication of Medi-Cal covered services.

(G) Recommendations on specific changes needed to state regulations or statute, the need for approval of amendments to the state Medicaid plan or federal
 waivers, changes to implementation of federal regulations, changes to state agency support and oversight, and associated staffing or funding needed to implement recommendations.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) The department, in consultation with the technical assistance teams, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, shall prepare materials for use by local educational agencies in developing the capacity to effectively secure sustainable funding for the delivery of comprehensive health and mental health services to pupils.

(h) The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek federal financial participation for the activities
 conducted pursuant to this section.

(i) The following definitions apply to this section:

(1) “County mental health plan” means an entity authorized pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 14680) of Chapter 8.8 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means an individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, excluding dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96), Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98), Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088), or Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, excluding dental managed care plans.

(D) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 101675) of Part 4 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues